Utah statutes.
62A-4a-105.   Division responsibilities.

The division shall:

(1)  administer services to minors and families, including child welfare services, domestic violence services, and all other responsibilities that the Legislature or the executive director may assign to the division;

(2)  establish standards for all contract providers of out-of-home care for minors and families;

(3)  cooperate with the federal government in the administration of child welfare and domestic violence programs and other human service activities assigned by the department;

(4)  provide for the compilation of relevant information, statistics, and reports on child and family service matters in the state;

(5)  prepare and submit to the department, the governor, and the Legislature reports of the operation and administration of the division in accordance with the requirements of Sections 62A-4a-117 and 62A-4a-118;

(6)  promote and enforce state and federal laws enacted for the protection of abused, neglected, dependent, delinquent, ungovernable, and runaway children, and status offenders, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, unless administration is expressly vested in another division or department of the state.  In carrying out the provisions of this Subsection (6), the division shall cooperate with the juvenile courts, the Division of Juvenile Justice Services, and with all public and private licensed child welfare agencies and institutions to develop and administer a broad range of services and supports.  The division shall take the initiative in all matters involving the protection of abused or neglected children if adequate provisions have not been made or are not likely to be made, and shall make expenditures necessary for the care and protection of those children, within the division's budget;

(7)  provide substitute care for dependent, abused, neglected, and delinquent children, establish standards for substitute care facilities, and approve those facilities;

(8)  provide adoption assistance to persons adopting children with special needs under Part 9, Adoption Assistance, of this chapter.  The financial support provided under this Subsection (8) may not exceed the amounts the division would provide for the child as a legal ward of the state;

(9)  cooperate with the Employment Development Division in the Department of Workforce Services in meeting social and economic needs of individuals eligible for public assistance;

(10)  conduct court-ordered home evaluations for the district and juvenile courts with regard to child custody issues.  The court shall order either or both parties to reimburse the division for the cost of that evaluation, in accordance with the community rate for that service or with the department's fee schedule rate;

(11)  provide noncustodial and in-home preventive services, designed to prevent family breakup, family preservation services, and reunification services to families whose children are in substitute care in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and Title 78A, Chapter 6, Juvenile Court Act of 1996;

(12)  provide protective supervision of a family, upon court order, in an effort to eliminate abuse or neglect of a child in that family;

(13)  establish programs and provide services to minors who have been placed in the custody of the division for reasons other than abuse or neglect, pursuant to Section 62A-4a-250;

(14)  provide shelter care in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and Title 78A, Chapter 6, Juvenile Court Act of 1996;

(15)  provide social studies and reports for the juvenile court in accordance with Section 78A-6-605;

(16)  arrange for and provide training for staff and providers involved in the administration and delivery of services offered by the division in accordance with this chapter;

(17)  provide domestic violence services in accordance with the requirements of federal law, and establish standards for all direct or contract providers of domestic violence services.  Within appropriations from the Legislature, the division shall provide or contract for a variety of domestic violence services and treatment methods;

(18)  ensure regular, periodic publication, including electronic publication, regarding the number of children in the custody of the division who have a permanency goal of adoption, or for whom a final plan of termination of parental rights has been approved, pursuant to Section 78A-6-314, and promote adoption of those children;

(19)  provide protective services to victims of domestic violence, as defined in Section 77-36-1, and their children, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and of Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part 3, Abuse, Neglect, and Dependency Proceedings;

(20)  refer an individual receiving services from the division to the local substance abuse authority or other private or public resource for court-ordered drug screening test.  The court shall order the individual to pay all costs of the tests unless:

(a)  the cost of the drug screening is specifically funded or provided for by other federal or state programs;

(b)  the individual is a participant in a drug court; or

(c)  the court finds that the individual is impecunious;

(21)  have authority to contract with a private, nonprofit organization to recruit and train foster care families and child welfare volunteers in accordance with Section 62A-4a-107.5; and

(22)  perform such other duties and functions as required by law.

